Washington statutes.
RCW 13.40.180

Single disposition order—Consecutive terms when two or more offenses—Limitations—Separate disposition order—Concurrent period of community supervision.

(1) Where a disposition in a single disposition order is imposed on a youth for two or more offenses, the terms shall run consecutively, subject to the following limitations:

(a) Where the offenses were committed through a single act or omission, omission, or through an act or omission which in itself constituted one of the offenses and also was an element of the other, the aggregate of all the terms shall not exceed 150 percent of the term imposed for the most serious offense;

(b) The aggregate of all consecutive terms shall not exceed three hundred percent of the term imposed for the most serious offense; and

(c) The aggregate of all consecutive terms of community supervision shall not exceed two years in length, or require any payment of fines or the performance of more than 200 hours of community restitution.

(2) Where disposition in separate disposition orders is imposed on a youth, the periods of community supervision contained in separate orders, if any, shall run concurrently. All other terms contained in separate disposition orders shall run consecutively.

[ 2023 c 449 s 19; 2012 c 177 s 3; 2002 c 175 s 24; 1981 c 299 s 14; 1977 ex.s. c 291 s 72.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 449: See note following RCW 13.40.058.

Effective date—2002 c 175: See note following RCW 7.80.130.

Effective dates—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 291: See notes following RCW 13.04.005.